Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1103 Principal; authority and
responsibility. The role of the principal shall include but not be limited
to overseeing the day-to-day management of the school, the primary function of
which is to develop and deliver instructional services to students in
accordance with statewide educational policy and to enable students to meet or
exceed statewide academic standards. The principal shall:

(1) Ensure that the curriculum facilitates the
achievement of the statewide student performance standards adopted for the
public school system;

(2) Develop and present to the school community
council for its review and approval, academic and financial plans relating to
the school;

(3) Exercise authority over the implementation of the
budget, policies, and operations of the school; and

(4) Collaborate with other principals in the
principal's school complex to ensure that:

(A) Logical, sequential curricula are adopted
within the school complex;

(B) Best practices are shared among and
implemented by schools within the school complex;

(C) The goals and objectives of the school
complex are being met;

(D) The use of school complex-based personnel
and contractors who divide their time between more than one school in a school
complex is coordinated to maximize efficiency; and

(E) The passage of students through the
continuum of grades is coordinated in a manner consistent with section
302A-1004. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 51, §16 and c 221, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next